California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
If the right, title, interest, lien or estate of a known or unknown defendant established by the decree of the court, is based upon a special assessment or arises from a special assessment, the decree establishing such rights shall direct the treasurer to cancel the special assessments on his records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3967.

If the court determines that none of the defendants have any right, title, interest, lien or estate in the property, the court shall render its final decree quieting the plantiff’s title under the tax deed and, if any of the defendants claims to be the owner of or have an interest in a special assessment, which special assessment the court determines to be invalid or inferior to plaintiff’s title, the decree shall direct that the treasurer cancel the assessment on his records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3968.

The decree, after it has become final, is conclusive against all the persons named in the complaint who have been served and all unknown persons and the heirs and devisees of any named defendant served as in this chapter provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1126.)
-------------------------------------------

3969.

After the judgment has become final, a certified copy thereof shall be delivered to the treasurer. Upon receipt of the copy, he shall cause to be canceled the special assessments described in the decree. The treasurer shall, upon his records, mark the special assessment as follows: “Canceled by judgment of court, superior court case number (here give number).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3970.

The remedy provided in this chapter shall be construed as cumulative and not exclusive of any other remedy, form or right of action or proceeding now allowed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3971.

“Treasurer,” as used in this chapter, means any person who is the custodian of the funds collected on special assessments and/or has the duty to cancel the assessments upon the payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3972.

“Special assessment,” as used in this chapter, means any assessment levied pursuant to any of the improvement acts of the State of California, whether or not represented by a bond, and which are liens upon a specific parcel of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. REDEMPTION [4101. - 4379.]



  CHAPTER 1. Redemption Generally [4101. - 4116.]

4101.

Tax-defaulted property may be redeemed until the right of redemption is terminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 69.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.5.

The tax collector may provide notification of the tax defaulted status of the property to the property owner. This notice is in addition to the notification required by Section 2612.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 527, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

The amount necessary to redeem shall be paid in lawful money of the United States and is the sum of the following:

(a) The total amount of all prior year defaulted taxes.

(b) Delinquent penalties and costs.

(c) Redemption penalties.

(d) A redemption fee of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) on each separately valued parcel tax defaulted after June 13, 1947, and prior to June 13, 1969. A redemption fee of two dollars ($2) on each separately valued parcel tax defaulted after June 12, 1969, and prior to January 1, 1979. A redemption fee of five dollars ($5) on each separately valued parcel tax defaulted after January 1, 1979, and prior to January 1, 1984, and a redemption fee of fifteen dollars ($15) on and after that date. On property tax defaulted prior to June 13, 1947, there shall be no redemption fee collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

(a) Redemption penalties are the sum of the following:

(1) Beginning July 1st of the year of the declaration of tax default, on the declared amount of defaulted taxes at the rate of 112 percent a month to the time of redemption. If the last day of any month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the additional penalty of 112 percent shall attach after the close of business on the next business day.

(2) Beginning July 1st of each subsequent year, on the unpaid taxes for which the property would have been declared in default if there had not been a previous declaration, 112 percent a month to the time of redemption. If the last day of any month falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the additional penalty of 112 percent shall attach after 5 p.m. on the next business day. If the board of supervisors, by adoption of an ordinance or resolution, closes the county’s offices for business prior to the time of delinquency on the “next business day” or for that whole day, that day shall be considered a legal holiday for purposes of this section.

(b) For purposes of an administrative hearing or any claim in a bankruptcy proceeding pertaining to the property being redeemed, the assessment of penalties determined pursuant to subdivision (a) with respect to the redemption of that property constitutes the assessment of interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 800, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

If the property is not on the current roll, the tax collector may do either of the following:

(a) Require that the redemptioner pay the current taxes and penalties as if the property were originally on the current roll.

(b) Require the redemptioner to pay the current taxes, penalties, and costs along with the amount necessary to redeem. The tax collector shall base his computation of the amount of these taxes on the valuation furnished him by the assessor.

This section is not applicable if the property is not on the current roll because of having been acquired by the state or other public agency other than by tax deed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.3.

After the settlement under Section 2630, the delinquent roll, or a photographic copy thereof, shall remain on file in the tax collector’s office and the auditor shall charge the tax collector with the amount of taxes, penalties and costs unpaid as shown on the delinquent roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

The tax collector shall be the redemption officer of the county. Application to redeem shall be made to the tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 830, Sec. 22.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.1.

The tax collector shall prepare an estimate of the amount necessary to redeem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1177.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.2.

When tax-defaulted property is redeemed and upon the request of the redemptioner, the tax collector shall issue a certificate of redemption. With the approval of the Controller as to form, each certificate of redemption shall show:

(a) The year of default.

(b) A description of the property.

(c) The amounts to be paid.

(d) The name of the person making the payment.

(e) The date of redemption.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, where no physical document of the extended redemption certificate is prepared, all entries required to be made on the extended certificate shall be so stored that it can be made readily available to the public in an understandable form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1184, Sec. 18.   Operative July 1, 1988, by Sec. 36 of Ch. 1184.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.

The certificates, with the money, shall be delivered to the tax collector and he or she shall receipt each certificate.

One certificate shall be given to the person making payment and one shall remain in the tax collector’s office.

Upon request of the assessor or the auditor, an additional certificate shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 497, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.1.

With the approval of the board of supervisors the tax collector may establish a procedure for making and preserving a record of individual redemption and installment payments. When such a procedure is established, receipts for redemption and installment payments made by mail shall only be issued when a receipt is requested by the person making payment. The redemption certificate or installment plan form shall contain a statement that receipts will not be issued for payments made by mail unless a receipt is requested by the person making payment, and an appropriate place in which the taxpayer may request a receipt shall be provided on the redemption certificate and the installment plan form. Receipts requested shall be furnished without cost to the taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1177.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.

Any redemption certificate may be destroyed by the county tax collector if (a) the destruction has been approved by order of the board of supervisors of the county, and (b) a certified, permanent record on a substitute media has been prepared in accordance with Section 26205 of the Government Code and the substitute media will be retained for at least 12 years from the date of creation of the original document. The substitute media may also be destroyed following the expiration of the 12-year retention period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 126, Sec. 26.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

4108.

(a) Not less than once every 12 months and on dates approved by the auditor the tax collector shall account to the auditor for all moneys collected during the preceding month under this part. On the same day he or she shall file with the auditor a statement under oath showing that all money collected by him or her has been paid as required by law.

(b) Not less than once every 12 months and on dates approved by the auditor, the tax collector shall file with the auditor a statement under oath within six months after the close of each month’s business showing an itemized account of all his or her transactions and receipts under this part including the amount collected for each fund or district extended on the roll for such month.

The amounts charged to the tax collector shall be reduced accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4108.5.

(a) The records and accounts of the tax collector pursuant to this part shall be audited at least once each three years.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 1993, and shall remain inoperative until July 1, 1994, on which date this section shall become operative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 60, Sec. 9.   Effective June 30, 1993.   Note: This amendment made subd. (a) inoperative from July 1, 1993, until July 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4109.

The tax collector shall note the fact and date of redemption on the margin of each delinquent roll opposite the description of the property.

In the event that part of the property is redeemed, the tax collector shall also note:

(a) A description of the parcel redeemed.

(b) The value of the parcel redeemed.

(c) The value of the remainder of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

4109.5.

If delinquent taxes are paid in installments, the tax collector may stamp or write “See Supplemental Record” on the margin of the delinquent roll, or abstract list.

On a supplemental record set up by the tax collector for the purpose, he shall show the name of the person making the payments, a description of the property, the amount paid, the year or years of delinquency, and the number of the certificate of redemption, if any, issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1177.)
-------------------------------------------

4110.

The tax collector shall prepare and set up a convenient and appropriate index record, or other workable system of tax-defaulted property. The record shall be kept regularly posted to reflect the immediate status of all items remaining unpaid on the delinquent rolls or abstract lists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

4112.

(a) When tax-defaulted property subject to the notice recorded under Section 3691.4 is redeemed, the tax collector shall collect all of the following, in addition to the amount required to redeem:

(1) A fee to reimburse the county for its actual and reasonable costs incurred in obtaining the names and last known mailing addresses of, and for mailing notices required by Sections 3701 and 3799 to, parties of interest as defined by Section 4675, which shall be distributed to the county general fund.

(2) A fee in the amount required by Section 27361.3 of the Government Code that shall be distributed to the county recorder
 for the cost of recordation of a rescission of the notice, as required by subdivision (c).

(3) A fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) if redemption is within 90 days of the proposed date for the tax sale of the redeemed property. In the case of unsold tax-defaulted properties remaining on the abstract after the tax sale, the fee shall become a part of the redemption amount and collectible whenever the property is redeemed. The fee shall be distributed to the county general fund to reimburse the county for costs incurred by the county in preparing to conduct that sale.

(4) The amount described in subdivision (c) of Section 3704.7 to reimburse the county for the cost of a personal contact required by that section.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the tax-defaulted property is redeemed prior to the proposed
 sale, but after the county has incurred notice or publication costs pursuant to Section 3702 or 3798 in connection with a notice of intended sale, a fee in an amount reasonably necessary to reimburse the tax collector for those costs may be collected.

(c) When tax-defaulted property subject to the notice recorded under Section 3691.4 is redeemed, the notice becomes null and void and the tax collector shall execute and record with the county recorder a rescission of the notice in the form prescribed by the Controller. The rescission shall be acknowledged by the county clerk, without charge.

(d) The amount of any fee imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or subdivision (b) shall be established by the board of supervisors of the county and shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 208, Sec. 2.   (AB 902)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.

Whenever tax-defaulted property is redeemed, the redemptioner or any other person claiming through the redemptioner may bring suit to quiet title to all or any portion of the property and prosecute it to final judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.

When it can be determined from an inspection of the tax records that the tax collector has erroneously computed the amount necessary to redeem a parcel of property as to which a redemption certificate has been issued, and such error has resulted in an underpayment of the amount required to redeem such property, the amount of redemption deficiency may be collected by the tax collector, if within four years after the date of the underpayment, the tax collector sends notice of or a bill for the underpayment by registered or certified mail to the assessee of the property for the year in which the underpayment was made, at his last known address. The notice shall show:

(1) That the tax collector made an unintended error in computing the amount required to redeem the property.

(2) That as a result of the error, the payment made to redeem such property was insufficient to pay the amount required to redeem as specified in Section 4102.

(3) In detail, the balance due.

(4) A statement that if payment of the amount due is not made within 30 days following the date of this notice, the amount due will be transferred to the secured roll prepared or being prepared and will be collected like other taxes on such roll.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.

If payment of the redemption deficiency is not made within 30 days following the mailing of the notice or bill required by Section 4114, the deficiency shall be transferred to the secured roll prepared or being prepared for the assessment year in which such notice or bill is mailed to the assessee, and shall thereafter be treated and collected like other taxes on such roll; provided, however, that if prior to the date of transfer to the secured roll, with the date of entry specified thereon, the real property on which such redemption deficiency constitutes a lien has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value or becomes subject to a bona fide encumbrance for value, such redemption deficiency shall not create, impose or constitute a lien on such real property but shall be transferred to the unsecured roll in the name of the assessee at the time the original insufficient payment was made and shall thereafter be treated and collected like other taxes on said roll.

The entry on the roll shall be followed with “Deficiency in Redemption of Parcel Number ____ on __________, 19 _.” The foregoing entry may be made on a document separate from the roll if reference is made on the roll to the document wherein the entry is made. The delinquent tax abstract from which the redemption deficiency is transferred may, at the option of the county, serve as the separate document.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

4116.

Any redemption deficiency on account of which the notice or bill required by Section 4114 is not mailed within 4 years after the date of the original insufficient payment shall not be collectible and shall, on order of the board of supervisors and with the written consent of the county legal advisor, be cancelled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Redemption of Part of Assessment [4131. - 4159.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [4131. - 4132.]

4131.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state and the intent of this chapter to provide for:

(a) The satisfaction and removal of any lien secured to any parcel of tax-defaulted property, and if the right of redemption has not been terminated, to any parcel of tax-defaulted property subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691.

(b) The redemption of any parcel of tax-defaulted property and, if the right of redemption has not been terminated, any parcel of tax-defaulted property subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691, separately from the whole parcel which originally became tax defaulted, if the parcel sought to be redeemed (1) is described in any duly executed and recorded deed, purchase contract, deed of trust, mortgage, or final decree of court; (2) had a separate valuation on the roll of the year for which it became tax defaulted; or (3) has a separate valuation on the current roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

4132.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) Improvements are not a parcel separate from the land on which they are situated.

(b) An undivided interest is a parcel separate from the whole assessment.

(c) A lien is the amount created by the assessment of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests; or the amount levied against property by a taxing agency or revenue district when such amount is not determined by the application of a tax rate on a valuation of property. A lien includes any special assessment bond, or installment thereof, together with interest and charges authorized and accruing thereto. A lien also includes any charge of any nature whatsoever authorized by law to be levied against property by any taxing agency or revenue district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Payments [4141. - 4143.]

4141.

Any person may apply to the tax collector to satisfy and remove any lien by paying the sum of the following:

(a) The sum of the amounts computed by multiplying the assessed value of the personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests by the applicable tax rate for each of the years for which it was delinquent, if the lien sought to be removed was created by a determination of the value of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests; or the sum of the amounts of the lien of the special assessment for each of the years for which it was delinquent; or the sum of the amounts of any other lien authorized by law to be levied against real property for each of the years for which it was delinquent. 

(b) Delinquent penalties in an amount which bear the same proportion to the delinquent penalties in the whole assessment as the amount of the lien bears to the total taxes levied in the whole assessment for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

(c) Costs computed in the same manner as provided for the computation of delinquent penalties.

(d) Redemption penalties computed on the amount of the lien for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

(e) The redemption fee provided for in this part, if the payment of the lien satisfies and removes all taxes levied against the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

4142.

Where delinquent taxes are being paid in installments, and a lien is sought to be satisfied and removed under this chapter, there shall be credited on the amount required to satisfy and remove the lien an amount which bears the same proportion to the amount which has been paid in installments on the whole assessment as the amount required to satisfy and remove the lien, excepting the redemption fee, bears to the amount necessary to redeem the whole assessment, excepting the redemption fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

4143.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the case of a deficiency in the payment of taxes due and payable pursuant to this part, the tax collector, with the approval of the board of supervisors, may accept partial payments from the taxpayer. The partial payments shall be applied first to all penalties, interest, and costs, and the balance, if any, shall be applied to the taxes due. The difference between the amount paid by the taxpayer and the amount due shall be treated as a delinquent tax in the same manner as any other defaulted tax.

(b) Partial payments made pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a redemption, a partial redemption, or an installment payment under
 this part and they shall not alter either the date upon which the property became tax defaulted or the date the property becomes subject to a power of sale.

(c) These partial payments shall not be construed as altering the amount of defaulted taxes for purposes of publications.

(d) An election may be made by the taxpayer to pay the delinquent taxes in installments under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4186) and, if so, the installment payment shall be based upon the balance of the redemption amount determined pursuant to this section.

(e) When the taxpayer requests a partial payment, or when the tax collector receives such a payment, the tax collector shall inform the taxpayer of the provisions of subdivision (b) by return mail.

(f) (1) Upon authorization by ordinance by the board of supervisors, the tax collector may charge a fee to recover the reasonable costs of instituting and maintaining a partial payment arrangement under the provisions of this chapter. The fee is a charge described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1 of Article XIIIC of the California Constitution and shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(2) The maximum fees that the tax collector may charge under the authorization of this section shall be established in the initial authorizing ordinance and limited to cost recovery only, pursuant to Section 54985 of the Government Code. Those fees, and any subsequent changes to those fees, shall be implemented consistent with Section 54985 of the Government Code, and after at least one public meeting, at which
 oral and written presentations may be made, as part of a regularly scheduled meeting held by the Board of Supervisors pursuant to Section 54986 of the Government Code.

(3) The ordinance authorizing the tax collector to charge a fee described in paragraph (1) shall require the fee to be paid prior to the application of any partial payments to penalties, interest, costs, and taxes due as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.   (AB 2291)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Applications and Computations [4151. - 4159.]

4151.

Any person filing an affidavit of interest may apply to the tax collector to have any parcel separately valued in order that it may be redeemed under the provisions of this chapter. The tax collector may file an application to have any parcel separately valued when such application is based on the fact that the parcel sought to be separately valued is separately assessed on the current roll.

The application shall set forth the fact that a duly executed and recorded deed, purchase contract, deed of trust, mortgage, or final decree of court describes the parcel sought to be separately valued.

The application may request that the tax created by the assessment of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests on the whole assessment for each of the years for which it was delinquent be allowed to remain as a lien on the parcel sought to be separately valued.

If any lien not determined by the application of a tax rate on a valuation of property has been levied or placed on the whole assessment, the application may be accompanied by the certification of the taxing agency or revenue district authorized by law to levy or place the lien, setting forth the specific amount of that portion of the lien levied or placed on the whole assessment which is to continue to be levied or placed on the parcel sought to be separately valued for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

Upon authorization by ordinance by the board of supervisors, the tax collector may charge an application fee for the actual cost incurred for the processing of an application for the separate valuation of any parcel for redemption under the provisions of this chapter. The fee shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1367, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4153.

The county assessor shall determine a separate valuation on the parcel for each of the years for which it was delinquent, and shall determine the valuation of the remaining parcel for each of the years for which it was delinquent. The sum of the valuations of the parcels shall equal their total valuation before separation.

If the application requested that the tax created by the assessment of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests be allowed to remain as a lien on the parcel sought to be separately valued, and the assessor determines that the value of the parcel is sufficient to secure the payment of the tax, the assessor shall set forth the value of such personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interest, for each of the years for which it was delinquent, opposite his determination of the value of the parcel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

4154.

If the assessor has set forth the value of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests opposite his or her determination of the value of the parcel, the amount of defaulted taxes on the parcel is the sum of the following:

(a) The sum of the amounts computed by multiplying the assessed value of the parcel by the applicable tax rate for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

(b) The sum of the amounts set forth in the certification of the taxing agency or revenue district as being the portion of the lien for each of the years for which it was delinquent which is to continue to be levied or placed on the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

4155.

If the assessor has not set forth the value of personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possessory interests opposite his determination of the value of the parcel, the amount of sold taxes on the parcel is the sum of the following:

(a) The sum of the amounts computed by multiplying the assessed value of the parcel by the applicable tax rate for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

(b) The sum of those amounts of tax on personal property, or leasehold improvements, or possesory interests computed by multiplying the assessed value by the applicable tax rate for each of the years for which it was delinquent, which bears the same proportion as the value of the parcel bears to the value of the whole assessment excepting the value of personal property, leasehold improvements, and possessory interests for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

(c) The sum of the amounts set forth in the certification of the taxing agency or revenue district as being the portion of the lien for each of the years for which it was delinquent which is to continue to be levied or placed on the parcel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

4156.

The amount necessary to redeem the parcel is the sum of the following:

(a) The amount of defaulted taxes on the parcel.

(b) Delinquent penalties in an amount which bear the same proportion to the delinquent penalties in the whole assessment as the amount of taxes and liens on the parcel bears to the total amount of taxes and liens on the whole assessment, determined for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

(c) Costs computed in the same manner provided for the computation of delinquent penalties.

(d) Redemption penalties computed on the amount of taxes and liens levied against the parcel for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

(e) The redemption fee provided for in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

4157.

The amount necessary to redeem the remaining parcel is the sum of the following:

(a) The amount of defaulted taxes on the whole assessment less the amount of defaulted taxes on the parcel separately valued.

(b) Delinquent penalties on the whole assessment less the amount of delinquent penalties on the parcel separately valued.

(c) Costs on the whole assessment less the amount of costs on the parcel separately valued.

(d) Redemption penalties computed on the amount of taxes and liens remaining on the parcel for each of the years for which it was delinquent.

(e) The redemption fee provided for in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

4158.

Where delinquent taxes are being paid in installments, and a parcel is separately redeemed under this chapter, there shall be credited on the amount necessary to redeem the parcel an amount which bears the same proportion to the total amount which has been paid in installments on the whole parcel as the redemption amount less the redemption fee on the parcel bears to the redemption amount less the redemption fee on the whole parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------

4159.

In all other respects, the redemption shall be made in the ordinary manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1293.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Redemption After Payment of Delinquent Taxes in Installments [4186. - 4337.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4186. - 4187.]

4186.

As used in this chapter, “taxes” includes all taxes and assessments and annual installments of assessments charged on the roll, except for the following:

(a) Special assessments pledged to the payment of debt service on bonds issued pursuant to the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code) for which the local agency has covenanted to foreclose on behalf of the bondholder pursuant to Section 8830 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) Special taxes pledged to the payment of debt service on bonds issued pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) for which the local agency has covenanted to foreclose on behalf of the bondholder pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 53356.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 946, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4187.

As used in this chapter, “back taxes” means all payments required to be made under any provision of law allowing payment of delinquent taxes in installments, except payments of current taxes due on the property and the penalties and costs on the current taxes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Permanent Installment Plan [4216. - 4226.]

4216.

As used in this article:

(a) “Redemption amount” means the total amount which would be necessary to redeem tax-defaulted property at the time an election is made to pay delinquent taxes in installments under this article.

(b) “Balance of the redemption amount” is the amount equal to the difference between the redemption amount and the total of the portions previously paid which portions were paid as a part of the redemption amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

4217.

(a) Any person may elect to pay delinquent taxes in installments under this article at any time prior to 5 p.m. on the last business day prior to the date when the tax collector obtains the power to sell the property, except that if payment of delinquent taxes in installments is started under this article and the amount required to be paid in any fiscal year is not paid as required by this article, payments on property that, but for the installment redemption plan, would have been subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 during the calendar year in which default on the redemption plan occurs may not again be started under this article. All other payments may be started on or after July 1 of the fiscal year commencing after the fiscal
 year in which default occurred.

(b) (1) A person electing to pay delinquent taxes in installments may be subject to a fee for processing the person’s request.

(2) The fee for payment of delinquent taxes in installments to the tax collector may be established by ordinance by the board of supervisors. The fee shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and may be collected on the tax bill.

(c) A redemption plan for which all payments due on or before January 7, 2025, have been timely made pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered in default until April 10, 2030, provided that the property
 that is located within a five-mile radius of the center of the Chiquita Canyon Landfill in the County of Los Angeles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 174, Sec. 2.   (AB 985)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4218.

(a) During the time payments are made under this article:

(1) The property subject to the installment plan shall not become subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691.

(2) The right of redemption shall not be terminated.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit or delay foreclosure pursuant to Section 8830 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit or delay foreclosure pursuant to Section 53356.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 946, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4219.

Election to pay delinquent taxes in installments is made by payment, in the same manner as a redemption, of 20 percent, or more, of the redemption amount. All current taxes, with penalties thereon, due or coming due in the fiscal year in which this first payment is made shall be paid before the delinquency date of the last installment of current taxes, except that if the election to pay delinquent taxes in installments is made on or after the delinquency date of the last installment of current taxes in any fiscal year, the current taxes, with penalties and costs thereon, shall be paid with or prior to the installment payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 784.)
-------------------------------------------

4220.

In each succeeding fiscal year the redemptioner shall pay all current taxes and penalties coming due in that fiscal year before the delinquency date of the last installment of current taxes.

Supplemental assessment tax installments that became delinquent after April 10 shall not default the installment plan of redemption, if paid on or before June 30.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

4221.

In each succeeding fiscal year the redemptioner shall pay, before the delinquency date of the last installment of current taxes, the sum of the following:

(a) That amount which is computed to be not less than the difference between the amounts previously paid under the provisions of this article, excepting amounts paid as interest, and

(1) 40 percent of the redemption amount when the payment is made during or prior to the first fiscal year following the year in which election was made to pay delinquent taxes in installments.

(2) 60 percent of the redemption amount when the payment is made during or prior to the second fiscal year following the year in which election was made to pay delinquent taxes in installments.

(3) 80 percent of the redemption amount when the payment is made during or prior to the third fiscal year following the year in which election was made to pay delinquent taxes in installments.
